Washington statutes.
RCW 18.85.045

Director's seal.

The director shall adopt a seal with the words "real estate director, state of Washington," and such other device as the director may approve engraved thereon, by which the director shall authenticate the proceedings of the office. Copies of all records and papers in the office of the director certified to be true copies under the hand and seal of the director shall be received in evidence in all cases equally and with like effect as the originals. The director may authorize one or more assistants to certify records and papers.

[ 2008 c 23 s 6; 1997 c 322 s 3; 1972 ex.s. c 139 s 5; 1941 c 252 s 8; RRS s 8340-31. Prior: 1925 ex.s. c 129 s 7. Formerly RCW 18.85.060.]